Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 4. Administration and Judicial Review.
Sec. 45.56.710.
Civil liability.

Enforcement of civil liability under this section is subject to P.L. 105-353 (Securities Litigation Uniform Standards Act of 1998).

A person is liable to the purchaser if the person sells a security in violation of AS

45.56.100

, or by means of an untrue statement of a material fact or an omission to state a material fact necessary to make the statement made, in light of the circumstances under which it is made, not misleading, the purchaser not knowing the untruth or omission and the seller not sustaining the burden of proof that the seller did not know and, in the exercise of reasonable care, could not have known of the untruth or omission. An action under this subsection is governed by the following:

the purchaser may maintain an action to recover the consideration paid for the security, less the amount of any income received on the security, and interest at the legal rate of interest under AS

09.30.070

, or eight percent a year, whichever is greater, from the date of the purchase, costs, and attorney fees as determined by the court, upon the tender of the security, or for actual damages as provided in (3) of this subsection;

the tender referred to in (1) of this subsection may be made any time before entry of judgment; tender requires only notice in a record of ownership of the security and willingness to exchange the security for the amount specified; a purchaser that no longer owns the security may recover actual damages as provided in (3) of this subsection;

actual damages in an action arising under this subsection are the amount that would be recoverable upon a tender less the value of the security when the purchaser disposed of it, and interest at the legal rate of interest under AS

09.30.070

, or eight percent a year, whichever is greater, from the date of the purchase, costs, and attorney fees as determined by the court.

A person is liable to the seller if the person buys a security by means of an untrue statement of a material fact or omission to state a material fact necessary to make the statement made, in light of the circumstances under which it is made, not misleading, the seller not knowing of the untruth or omission, and the purchaser not sustaining the burden of proof that the purchaser did not know and, in the exercise of reasonable care, could not have known of the untruth or omission. An action under this subsection is governed by the following:

the seller may maintain an action to recover the security and any income received on the security, costs, and attorney fees as determined by the court, upon the tender of the purchase price, or for actual damages as provided in (3) of this subsection;

the tender referred to in (1) of this subsection may be made any time before entry of judgment; tender requires only notice in a record of the present ability to pay the amount tendered and willingness to take delivery of the security for the amount specified; if the purchaser no longer owns the security, the seller may recover actual damages as provided in (3) of this subsection;

actual damages in an action arising under this subsection are the difference between the price at which the security was sold and the value the security would have had at the time of the sale in the absence of the purchaser’s conduct causing liability, and interest at the legal rate of interest under AS

09.30.070

, or eight percent a year, whichever is greater, from the date of the sale of the security, costs, and attorney fees as determined by the court.

A person acting as a broker-dealer or agent that sells or buys a security in violation of AS

45.56.300(a)

,

45.56.340(a)

, or

45.56.530

is liable to the customer. The customer, if a purchaser, may maintain an action for recovery of actual damages as specified in (b) of this section or, if a seller, for a remedy as specified in (c) of this section.

A person acting as an investment adviser or investment adviser representative that provides investment advice for compensation in violation of AS

45.56.340(a)

,

45.56.350(a)

, or

45.56.530

is liable to the client. The client may maintain an action to recover the consideration paid for the advice, interest at the legal rate of interest under AS

09.30.070

, or eight percent a year, whichever is greater, from the date of payment, costs, and attorney fees as determined by the court.

A person that receives, directly or indirectly, any consideration for providing investment advice to another person and that employs a device, scheme, or artifice to defraud the other person or engages in an act, practice, or course of business that operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit on the other person is liable to the other person. An action under this subsection is governed by the following:

the person defrauded may maintain an action to recover the consideration paid for the advice and the amount of any actual damages caused by the fraudulent conduct, interest at the legal rate of interest under AS

09.30.070

, or eight percent a year, whichever is greater, from the date of the fraudulent conduct, costs, and reasonable attorney fees as determined by the court, less the amount of any income received as a result of the fraudulent conduct;

this subsection does not apply to a broker-dealer or its agents if the investment advice provided is solely incidental to transacting business as a broker-dealer and special compensation is not received for the investment advice.

The following persons are liable jointly and severally with and to the same extent as persons liable under (b) — (f) of this section:

a person that directly or indirectly controls a person liable under (b) — (f) of this section, unless the controlling person sustains the burden of proof that the person did not know and, in the exercise of reasonable care, could not have known of the existence of conduct because of which the liability is alleged to exist;

an individual who is a managing partner, executive officer, or director of a person liable under (b) — (f) of this section, including an individual having a similar status or performing similar functions, unless the individual sustains the burden of proof that the individual did not know and, in the exercise of reasonable care, could not have known of the existence of conduct because of which the liability is alleged to exist;

an individual who is an employee of or associated with a person liable under (b) — (f) of this section and who materially aids the conduct giving rise to the liability, unless the individual sustains the burden of proof that the individual did not know and, in the exercise of reasonable care, could not have known of the existence of conduct because of which the liability is alleged to exist; and

a person that is a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative that materially aids the conduct giving rise to the liability under (b) — (f) of this section, unless the person sustains the burden of proof that the person did not know and, in the exercise of reasonable care, could not have known of the existence of conduct because of which the liability is alleged to exist.

A person liable under this section has a right of contribution as in cases of contract against any other person liable under this section for the same conduct.

A cause of action under this section survives the death of an individual who might have been a plaintiff or defendant.

A person may not obtain relief under (b) of this section

for a violation of AS

45.56.100

, or under (d) or (e) of this section, unless the action is instituted within three years after the violation occurred; or

other than for a violation of AS

45.56.100

, or under (c) or (f) of this section, unless the action is instituted within the earlier of two years after discovery of the facts constituting the violation or five years after the violation.

A person that has made, or has engaged in the performance of, a contract in violation of this chapter or a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter or that has acquired a purported right under the contract with knowledge of conduct because of which its making or performance was in violation of this chapter may not base an action on the contract.

A condition, stipulation, or provision binding a person purchasing or selling a security or receiving investment advice to waive compliance with this chapter or a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter is void.

The rights and remedies provided by this chapter are in addition to any other rights or remedies that may exist, but this chapter does not create a cause of action not specified in this section or AS

45.56.420(e)

.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS

45.56.660

; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36, ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.720.
Rescission offers.

A purchaser, seller, or recipient of investment advice may not maintain an action under AS

45.56.710

if

the purchaser, seller, or recipient of investment advice receives, in a record, before the action is instituted,

an offer stating the respect in which liability under AS

45.56.710

may have arisen and fairly advising the purchaser, seller, or recipient of investment advice of that person’s rights in connection with the offer and any financial or other information necessary to correct all material misrepresentations or omissions in the information that was required by this chapter to be furnished to that person at the time of the purchase, sale, or investment advice;

if the basis for relief under this section may have been a violation of AS

45.56.710(b)

, an offer to repurchase the security for cash, payable on delivery of the security, equal to the consideration paid, and interest at the legal rate of interest under AS

09.30.070

, or eight percent a year, whichever is greater, from the date of the purchase, less the amount of any income received on the security, or, if the purchaser no longer owns the security, an offer to pay the purchaser, upon acceptance of the offer, damages in an amount that would be recoverable upon a tender, less the value of the security when the purchaser disposed of it, and interest at the legal rate of interest under AS

09.30.070

, or eight percent a year, whichever is greater, from the date of the purchase in cash equal to the damages computed in the manner provided in this subparagraph;

if the basis for relief under this section may have been a violation of AS

45.56.710(c)

, an offer to tender the security, on payment by the seller of an amount equal to the purchase price paid, less income received on the security by the purchaser and interest at the legal rate of interest under AS 09.30.070, or eight percent a year, whichever is greater, from the date of the sale, or, if the purchaser no longer owns the security, an offer to pay the seller, upon acceptance of the offer, in cash, damages in the amount of the difference between the price at which the security was purchased and the value the security would have had at the time of the purchase in the absence of the purchaser’s conduct that may have caused liability and interest at the legal rate of interest in AS 09.30.070, or eight percent a year, whichever is greater, from the date of the sale;

if the basis for relief under this section may have been a violation of AS

45.56.710(d)

; and if the customer is a purchaser, an offer to pay as specified in (B) of this paragraph; or, if the customer is a seller, an offer to tender or to pay as specified in (C) of this paragraph;

if the basis for relief under this section may have been a violation of AS

45.56.710(e)

, an offer to reimburse in cash the consideration paid for the advice and interest at the legal rate of interest under AS 09.30.070, or eight percent a year, whichever is greater, from the date of payment; or

if the basis for relief under this section may have been a violation of AS

45.56.710(f)

, an offer to reimburse in cash the consideration paid for the advice, the amount of any actual damages that may have been caused by the conduct, and interest at the legal rate of interest under AS 09.30.070, or eight percent a year, whichever is greater, from the date of the violation causing the loss;

the offer under (1) of this subsection states that it must be accepted by the purchaser, seller, or recipient of investment advice within 30 days after the date of its receipt by the purchaser, seller, or recipient of investment advice or any shorter period of not less than three days that the administrator, by order, specifies;

the offeror has the present ability to pay the amount offered or to tender the security under (1) of this subsection;

the offer under (1) of this subsection is delivered to the purchaser, seller, or recipient of investment advice or sent in a manner that ensures receipt by the purchaser, seller, or recipient of investment advice; and

the purchaser, seller, or recipient of investment advice that accepts the offer under (1) of this subsection, in a record, within the period specified under (2) of this subsection, is paid in accordance with the terms of the offer.

The offer under this section shall be filed with the administrator 10 business days before the offering and conform in form and content with a regulation adopted under this chapter.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 45.56.665; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Cross references. —

For the effect of subsection (c) on Rule 65, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, see sec. 30(d), ch. 65, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.730.
Criminal enforcement.

A person who intentionally violates this chapter, except AS

45.56.550

or the notice filing requirements of AS

45.56.200

or

45.56.360

, is guilty of a class C felony punishable by imprisonment under AS

12.55.125

or by a fine of not more than $100,000, or by both.

A person who intentionally alters, destroys, shreds, mutilates, or conceals a record, document, or other object, or attempts to do so, with the intent to alter or impair the record, document, or object for use in an official proceeding under this chapter, is guilty of a class C felony. A person convicted of violating this subsection is punishable by imprisonment as provided in AS

12.55.125

, by a fine of not more than $500,000, or by both.

The attorney general, with or without a reference from the administrator, may institute criminal proceedings under this chapter.

This chapter does not limit the power of this state to punish a person for conduct that constitutes a crime under other laws of this state.

In this section, “intentionally” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900(a)

.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS

45.56.670

; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36, ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.740.
Judicial review.

A person may obtain judicial review by the superior court of a final order issued by the administrator under this chapter by filing a notice of appeal in accordance with the applicable rules of court governing appeals in civil matters. The notice of appeal shall be filed within 30 days after the order becomes final under AS

44.64.060

.

A regulation adopted under this chapter is subject to judicial review under AS

44.62.300

.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 45.56.675; renumbered in 2018.

Cross references. —

For the effect of subsection (a) on Rules 602, Alaska Rules of Appellate Procedure, see sec. 30(e), ch. 65, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 36, ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.800.
Reimbursement of expenses incident to examination or investigation.

The administrator may require an issuer, broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser representative, federal covered adviser, or investment adviser to reimburse the administrator for actual travel expenses and per diem incurred in connection with an examination or investigation under this chapter.

The administrator may by regulation or order adopt a schedule of charges for examination and investigation of issuers, broker-dealers, agents, investment adviser representatives, federal covered advisers, and investment advisers.

If an issuer, broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser representative, federal covered adviser, or investment adviser fails to pay the fees and expenses provided for in this section, the fees and expenses shall be paid out of funds of the administrator in the same manner as other disbursements made by the administrator. The amounts paid from the funds of the administrator are a lien on all of the assets and property of the issuer, broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser representative, federal covered adviser, or investment adviser, and the amount may be recovered by the attorney general on behalf of this state.

Failure of the issuer, broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser representative, federal covered adviser, or investment adviser to pay fees and expenses under this section is a willful violation of this chapter, and the violation falls within the provisions of AS

45.56.220

,

45.56.350

, and

45.56.620

.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

45.56.710

; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36, ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.810.
Electronic records and signatures.

This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes 15 U.S.C. 7001 — 7031 (Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act), but does not modify, limit, or supersede 15 U.S.C. 7001(c) or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in 15 U.S.C. 7003(b). This chapter authorizes the filing of records and signatures, when specified by provisions of this chapter or by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter, in a manner consistent with 15 U.S.C. 7004(a).

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

45.56.720

; renumbered in 2018.

Effective dates. —

Section 36, ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.820.
References to federal statutes.

In this chapter, a reference to the following federal statutes, including a statute within a spanned reference, means those statutes and the rules and regulations adopted under those statutes, as in effect on the date of enactment of this chapter:

7 U.S.C. 1 — 27 (Commodity Exchange Act);

15 U.S.C. 77a — 77aa (Securities Act of 1933);

15 U.S.C. 77b, 77k, 77m, 77p, 77r, 77v, 77z-1 — 77z-3, 77aa, 77ccc, 77ddd, 77mmm, 77sss, 78a, 78c, 78d, 78g, 78n, 78o, 78o-4, 78o-5, 78s, 78t, 78u, 78u-4, 78z, 78bb, 78ee, 78kk, 78ll, 80a-2, 80a-3, 80a-12, 80a-18, 80a-29, 80a-30, 80b-3, and 80b-18a (Securities Litigation Uniform Standards Act of 1998);

15 U.S.C. 78a — 78pp (Securities Exchange Act of 1934);

15 U.S.C. 80a-1 — 80a-64 (Investment Company Act of 1940);

15 U.S.C. 80b-1 — 80b-21 (Investment Advisers Act of 1940);

15 U.S.C. 661 — 697g (Small Business Investment Act of 1958);

15 U.S.C. 7001 — 7031 (Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act);

26 U.S.C. (Internal Revenue Code);

29 U.S.C. 1001 — 1461 (Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974);

42 U.S.C. 16451 — 16481 (Energy Policy Act of 2005).

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS

45.56.730

; renumbered in 2018.

Effective dates. —

Section 36, ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.830.
References to federal agencies.

A reference in this chapter to an agency or department of the United States is also a reference to a successor agency or department.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

45.56.740

; renumbered in 2018.

Effective dates. —

Section 36, ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.900.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,

“administrator” means the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development or a designee of the commissioner;

“agent” means an individual, other than a broker-dealer, who represents a broker-dealer in effecting or attempting to effect purchases or sales of securities or represents an issuer in effecting or attempting to effect purchases or sales of the issuer’s securities; however, a partner, officer, or director of a broker-dealer or issuer, or an individual having a similar status or performing similar functions is an agent only if the individual otherwise comes within the term; “agent” does not include an individual excluded by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter;

“bank” means

a banking institution organized under the laws of the United States;

a member bank of the Federal Reserve System;

any other banking institution, whether incorporated or not, doing business under the laws of a state or of the United States, a substantial portion of the business of which consists of receiving deposits or exercising fiduciary powers similar to those permitted to be exercised by national banks under the authority of the United States Comptroller of the Currency under 12 U.S.C. 92a, that is supervised and examined by a state or federal agency having supervision over banks, and that is not operated for the purpose of evading this chapter; and

a receiver, conservator, or other liquidating agent of any institution or firm included in (A), (B), or (C) of this paragraph;

“broker-dealer” means a person engaged in the business of effecting transactions in securities for the accounts of others or for the person’s own account; “broker-dealer” does not include

an agent;

an issuer;

a bank, trust company organized or chartered under the laws of this state, or savings institution if its activities as a broker-dealer are limited to those specified in 15 U.S.C. 78c(a)(4)(B)(i) — (vi), (viii) — (x), and (xi) if limited to unsolicited transactions, or 15 U.S.C. 78c(a)(5)(B) and (C), or a bank that satisfies the conditions described in 15 U.S.C. 78c(a)(4);

an international banking institution; or

a person excluded by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter;

“defraud” includes engaging in common law deceit;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“depository institution” means

a bank; or

a savings institution, trust company, credit union, or similar institution that is organized or chartered under the laws of a state or of the United States, authorized to receive deposits and supervised and examined by an official or agency of a state or the United States if its deposits or share accounts are insured to the maximum amount authorized by statute by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the National Credit Union Share Insurance Fund, or a successor authorized by federal law; “depository institution” does not include

an insurance company or other organization primarily engaged in the business of insurance;

a Morris Plan bank; or

an industrial loan company that is not an insured depository institution as defined in 12 U.S.C. 1813(c)(2) (Federal Deposit Insurance Act), or any successor federal statute;

“federal covered investment adviser” means a person registered under 15 U.S.C. 80b-1 — 80b-21 (Investment Advisers Act of 1940);

“federal covered security” means a security that is, or upon completion of a transaction will be, a covered security under 15 U.S.C. 77r(b) (Securities Act of 1933) or rules or regulations adopted under that provision;

“filing” means the receipt under this chapter of a record by the administrator or a designee of the administrator;

“former AS 45.55” means AS 45.55 as the provisions under that chapter read on the day before the effective date of this section;

“fraud” and “deceit” include common law deceit;

“guaranteed” means guaranteed as to payment of all principal and all interest;

“institutional investor” means any of the following, whether acting for itself or for others in a fiduciary capacity:

a depository institution, a trust company organized or chartered under the laws of this state, or an international banking institution;

an insurance company;

a separate account of an insurance company;

an investment company as defined in 15 U.S.C. 80a-1 — 80a-64 (Investment Company Act of 1940);

a broker-dealer registered under 15 U.S.C. 78a – 78pp (Securities Exchange Act of 1934);

an employee pension, profit-sharing, or benefit plan if the plan has total assets in excess of $10,000,000 or its investment decisions are made by a named fiduciary, as defined in 29 U.S.C. 1102(a)(2) (Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974), that is a broker-dealer registered under 15 U.S.C. 78a — 78pp (Securities Exchange Act of 1934), an investment adviser registered or exempt from registration under 15 U.S.C. 80b-1 — 80b-21 (Investment Advisers Act of 1940), an investment adviser registered under this chapter, a depository institution, or an insurance company;

a plan established and maintained by a state, a political subdivision of a state, or an agency or instrumentality of a state or a political subdivision of a state for the benefit of its employees if the plan has total assets in excess of $10,000,000 or its investment decisions are made by a legally designated public official or by a named fiduciary, as defined in 29 U.S.C. 1102(a)(2) (Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974), that is a broker-dealer registered under 15 U.S.C. 78a — 78pp (Securities Exchange Act of 1934), an investment adviser registered or exempt from registration under 15 U.S.C. 80b-1 — 80b-21 (Investment Advisers Act of 1940), an investment adviser registered under this chapter, a depository institution, or an insurance company;

a trust if that trust has total assets in excess of $10,000,000, the trustee of the trust is a depository institution, and the participants in the trust are exclusively plans of the types identified in (F) or (G) of this paragraph, regardless of the size of their assets, except a trust that includes as participants self-directed individual retirement accounts or similar self-directed plans;

an organization described in 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) (Internal Revenue Code), corporation, Massachusetts trust or similar business trust, limited liability company, or partnership, not formed for the specific purpose of acquiring the securities offered, with total assets in excess of $10,000,000;

a small business investment company licensed by the United States Small Business Administration under 15 U.S.C. 681(c) (Small Business Investment Act of 1958) with total assets in excess of $10,000,000;

a private business development company as defined in 15 U.S.C. 80b-2(a)(22) (Investment Advisers Act of 1940) with total assets in excess of $10,000,000;

a federal covered investment adviser acting for its own account;

a qualified institutional buyer, as defined in 17 C.F.R. 230.144A, other than 17 C.F.R. 230.144A(a)(1)(i)(H), adopted under 15 U.S.C. 77a — 77aa (Securities Act of 1933);

a major United States institutional investor, as defined in 17 C.F.R. 240.15a-6(b)(4)(i), adopted under 15 U.S.C. 78a — 78pp (Securities Exchange Act of 1934);

any other person, other than an individual, of institutional character with total assets in excess of $10,000,000 not organized for the specific purpose of evading this chapter; or

any other person specified by regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter;

“insurance company” means a company organized as an insurance company whose primary business is writing insurance or reinsuring risks underwritten by insurance companies and that is subject to supervision by the insurance commissioner or a similar official or agency of a state;

“insured” means insured as to payment of all principal and all interest;

“international banking institution” means an international financial institution of which the United States is a member and whose securities are exempt from registration under 15 U.S.C. 77a — 77aa (Securities Act of 1933);

“investment adviser” means a person that, for compensation, engages in the business of advising others, either directly or through publications or writings, as to the value of securities or the advisability of investing in, purchasing, or selling securities or that, for compensation and as a part of a regular business, issues or produces analyses or reports concerning securities; “investment adviser” includes a financial planner or other person that, as an integral component of other financially related services, provides investment advice to others for compensation as part of a business or that holds itself out as providing investment advice to others for compensation; “investment adviser” does not include

an investment adviser representative;

a lawyer, accountant, engineer, or teacher whose performance of investment advice is solely incidental to the practice of the person’s profession;

a broker-dealer or its agents whose performance of investment advice is solely incidental to the conduct of business as a broker-dealer and that does not receive special compensation for the investment advice;

a publisher of a bona fide newspaper, news magazine, or business or financial publication of general and regular circulation;

a federal covered investment adviser;

a bank, a trust company organized or chartered under the laws of this state, or a savings institution;

any other person that is excluded by 15 U.S.C. 80b-1 — 80b- 21 (Investment Advisers Act of 1940) from the definition of investment adviser; or

any other person excluded by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter;

“investment adviser representative” means an individual employed by or associated with an investment adviser or federal covered investment adviser and who makes any recommendations or otherwise gives investment advice regarding securities, manages accounts or portfolios of clients, determines which recommendation or advice regarding securities should be given, provides investment advice or offers to provide investment advice, receives compensation to solicit, offer, or negotiate for the sale of or for selling investment advice, or supervises employees who perform any of the foregoing; “investment adviser representative” does not include an individual who

performs only clerical or ministerial acts;

is an agent whose performance of investment advice is solely incidental to the individual’s acting as an agent and who does not receive special compensation for investment advisory services;

is employed by or associated with a federal covered investment adviser, unless the individual has a place of business in this state, as that term is defined by rule adopted under 15 U.S.C. 80b-3a (Investment Advisers Act of 1940) and is

an investment adviser representative, as that term is defined by rule adopted under 15 U.S.C. 80b-3a (Investment Advisers Act of 1940); or

not a supervised person, as that term is defined in 15 U.S.C. 80b-2(a)(25) (Investment Advisers Act of 1940); or

is excluded by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter;

“issuer” means a person that issues or proposes to issue a security, subject to the following:

the issuer of a voting trust certificate, collateral trust certificate, certificate of deposit for a security, or share in an investment company without a board of directors or individuals performing similar functions is the person performing the acts and assuming the duties of depositor or manager under the trust or other agreement or instrument under which the security is issued;

the issuer of an equipment trust certificate or similar security serving the same purpose is the person by which the property is or will be used or to which the property or equipment is or will be leased or conditionally sold or that is otherwise contractually responsible for ensuring payment of the certificate;

the issuer of a fractional undivided interest in an oil, gas, or other mineral lease or in payments out of production under a lease, right, or royalty is the owner of an interest in the lease or in payments out of production under a lease, right, or royalty, whether whole or fractional, that creates fractional interests for the purpose of sale;

“nonissuer transaction” or “nonissuer distribution” means a transaction or distribution not directly or indirectly for the benefit of the issuer;

“offer to purchase” includes an attempt or offer to obtain, or solicitation of an offer to sell, a security or interest in a security for value; “offer to purchase” does not include a tender offer that is subject to 15 U.S.C. 78n(d) (Securities Exchange Act of 1934);

“older person” means a natural person who is 60 years of age or older;

“person” means an individual, a corporation, a partnership, a limited liability company, a limited partnership, a limited liability partnership, an association, a joint-stock company, a trust in which the interests of the beneficiaries are evidenced by a security, an unincorporated organization, a government, or a political subdivision of a government;

“place of business” of a broker-dealer, an investment adviser, or a federal covered investment adviser means

an office at which the broker-dealer, investment adviser, or federal covered investment adviser regularly provides brokerage or investment advice or solicits, meets with, or otherwise communicates with customers or clients; or

any other location that is held out to the general public as a location at which the broker-dealer, investment adviser, or federal covered investment adviser provides brokerage or investment advice or solicits, meets with, or otherwise communicates with customers or clients;

“price amendment” means the amendment to a registration statement filed under 15 U.S.C. 77a — 77aa (Securities Act of 1933) or, if an amendment is not filed, the prospectus or prospectus supplement filed under 15 U.S.C. 77a — 77aa (Securities Act of 1933) that includes a statement of the offering price, underwriting and selling discounts or commissions, amount of proceeds, conversion rates, call prices, and other matters dependent on the offering price;

“principal place of business” of a broker-dealer or an investment adviser means the executive office of the broker-dealer or investment adviser from which the officers, partners, or managers of the broker-dealer or investment adviser direct, control, and coordinate the activities of the broker-dealer or investment adviser;

“record,” except in the phrases “of record,” “official record,” and “public record,” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form;

“sale” includes every contract of sale, contract to sell, or disposition of a security or interest in a security for value, and “offer to sell” includes every attempt or offer to dispose of, or solicitation of an offer to purchase, a security or interest in a security for value; both terms include

a security given or delivered with, or as a bonus because of, a purchase of securities or any other thing constituting part of the subject of the purchase and having been offered and sold for value;

a gift of assessable stock involving an offer and sale; and

a sale or offer of a warrant or right to purchase or subscribe to another security of the same or another issuer and a sale or offer of a security that gives the holder a present or future right or privilege to convert the security into another security of the same or another issuer, including an offer of the other security;

“Securities and Exchange Commission” means the United States Securities and Exchange Commission;

“securities business” means a business that provides the services provided by

investment advisers, federal covered investment advisers, or investment adviser representatives; or

broker-dealers, issuers, or agents of broker-dealers or issuers;

“security” means a note; stock; treasury stock; security future; bond; debenture; evidence of indebtedness; certificate of interest or participation in a profit-sharing agreement; collateral trust certificate; preorganization certificate or subscription; transferable share; investment contract; voting trust certificate; certificate of deposit for a security; viatical settlement; fractional undivided interest in oil, gas, or other mineral rights; put, call, straddle, option, or privilege on a security, certificate of deposit, or group or index of securities, including an interest in or based on the value of a put, call, straddle, option, or privilege on a security, certificate of deposit, or group or index of securities; put, call, straddle, option, or privilege entered into on a national securities exchange relating to foreign currency; or, in general, an interest or instrument commonly known as a “security”; or a certificate of interest or participation in, temporary or interim certificate for, receipt for, guarantee of, or warrant or right to subscribe to or purchase any of the foregoing; “security”

includes

both a certificated and an uncertificated security;

an investment in a common enterprise with the expectation of profits to be derived primarily from the efforts of a person other than the investor; in this sub-subparagraph, “common enterprise” means an enterprise in which the fortunes of the investor are interwoven with those of the person offering the investment, a third party, or other investors;

as an investment contract, among other contracts, an interest in a limited partnership and a limited liability company, and an investment in a viatical settlement or similar agreement; and

a viatical settlement interest;

does not include

a participation agreement entered under AS

14.40.802

or an insurance or endowment policy subject to AS 21;

an interest in a contributory or noncontributory pension or welfare plan subject to 29 U.S.C. 1001 — 1461 (Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974);

“self-regulatory organization” means a national securities exchange registered under 15 U.S.C. 78a — 78pp (Securities Exchange Act of 1934), a national securities association of broker-dealers registered under 15 U.S.C. 78a — 78pp (Securities Exchange Act of 1934), a clearing agency registered under 15 U.S.C. 78a — 78pp (Securities Exchange Act of 1934), or the Municipal Securities Rulemaking Board established under 15 U.S.C. 78o-4 (Securities Exchange Act of 1934);

“sign” means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record,

to execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

to attach or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process;

“state” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States;

“vulnerable adult” has the meaning given in AS

47.24.900

.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.